District of Columbia statutes.
5-331.02

Definitions.

For the purposes of this subchapter, the term:

(1)

“First Amendment assembly” means a demonstration, rally, parade, march, picket line, or other similar gathering conducted for the purpose of persons expressing their political, social, or religious views.

(2)

“MPD” means the Metropolitan Police Department.

History

Apr. 13, 2005, D.C. Law 15-352, § 102, 52 DCR 2296